Connecticut, session 2026, SB00091.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 51-277a of the 2026 supplement to the general
2 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
3 (Effective from passage):
4 (a) (1) As used in this section:
5 (A) "Peace officer" means a member of the Division of State Police
6 within the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection or
7 an organized local police department, a chief inspector or inspector in
8 the Division of Criminal Justice, a state marshal while exercising
9 authority granted under any provision of the general statutes, a judicial
10 marshal in the performance of the duties of a judicial marshal, a
11 conservation officer or special conservation officer, as defined in section
12 26-5, a constable who performs criminal law enforcement duties, a
13 special policeman appointed under section 29-18, 29-18a, 29-18b or 29-
14 19, an adult probation officer, an official of the Department of Correction
15 authorized by the Commissioner of Correction to make arrests in a
16 correctional institution or facility, any investigator in the investigations
17 unit of the office of the State Treasurer, an inspector of motor vehicles in
18 the Department of Motor Vehicles, who is certified under the provisions
LCO 1 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 91
19 of sections 7-294a to 7-294e, inclusive, any federal law enforcement
20 officer as defined under 18 USC 115(c)(1) and 34 USC 50301(5), or a
21 member of a law enforcement unit of the Mashantucket Pequot Tribe or
22 the Mohegan Tribe of Indians of Connecticut created and governed by
23 a memorandum of agreement under section 47-65c who is certified as a
24 police officer by the Police Officer Standards and Training Council
25 pursuant to sections 7-294a to 7-294e, inclusive;
26 (B) "Deadly physical force" has the same meaning as provided in
27 section 53a-3; and
28 (C) "Electronic defense weapon" has the same meaning as provided
29 in section 53a-3.
30 [(a) (1)] (2) Whenever a peace officer, in the performance of such
31 officer's duties, uses physical force upon another person and such
32 person dies as a result thereof or uses deadly physical force [, as defined
33 in section 53a-3,] upon another person, the Division of Criminal Justice
34 shall cause an investigation to be made and the Inspector General shall
35 have the responsibility of determining whether the use of physical force
36 by the peace officer was justifiable under section 53a-22, as amended by
37 this act. The use of an electronic defense weapon [, as defined in section
38 53a-3,] by a peace officer shall not be considered deadly physical force
39 for purposes of this section.
40 [(2)] (3) (A) Except as provided under subdivision [(1)] (2) of this
41 subsection, whenever a person dies in the custody of a peace officer or
42 law enforcement agency, the Inspector General shall investigate and
43 determine whether physical force was used by a peace officer upon the
44 deceased person, and if so, whether the use of physical force by the
45 peace officer was justifiable under section 53a-22, as amended by this
46 act. If the Inspector General determines the deceased person may have
47 died as a result of criminal action not involving the use of force by a
48 peace officer, the Inspector General shall refer such case to the Chief
49 State's Attorney or a state's attorney for potential prosecution.
50 (B) Except as provided under subdivision [(1)] (2) of this subsection
LCO 2 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 91
51 or subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, [(2) of this subsection,]
52 whenever a person dies in the custody of the Commissioner of
53 Correction, the Inspector General shall investigate and determine
54 whether the deceased person may have died as a result of criminal
55 action, and, if so, refer such case to the Chief State's Attorney or a state's
56 attorney for potential prosecution.
57 [(3)] (4) Whenever a person who (A) is a next of kin of a deceased
58 person, (B) is not notified of such deceased person's death as required
59 pursuant to section 7-294mm and no other person who is a next of kin
60 of the deceased person was so notified, and (C) requests of the Office of
61 the Inspector General an investigation of the lack of notification or
62 timely notification of such death, the Inspector General shall investigate
63 and determine whether there was any malfeasance on the part of a peace
64 officer, except for a federal law enforcement officer, or a supervisor of
65 the peace officer, except for a federal law enforcement officer, in the
66 failure to provide such notification or timely notification, and if so, may
67 make recommendations to the Police Officer Standards and Training
68 Council established under section 7-294b concerning censure,
69 suspension, renewal, cancelation or revocation of the peace officer's or
70 supervisor's certification, provided any such recommendation may be
71 made to said council only in a case where such failure is found to be
72 intentional or made with reckless indifference. If there is no finding that
73 such failure was intentional or made with reckless indifference, a
74 recommendation may be made to the officer's or supervisor's employing
75 agency for any further disciplinary action as so determined by such
76 employing agency.
77 [(4)] (5) The Inspector General shall request the appropriate law
78 enforcement agency to provide such assistance as is necessary to
79 investigate and make a determination under subdivision [(1), (2) or (3)]
80 (2), (3) or (4) of this subsection.
81 [(5)] (6) Whenever a peace officer, in the performance of such officer's
82 duties, uses physical force or deadly physical force upon another person
83 and such person dies as a result thereof, the Inspector General shall
LCO 3 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 91
84 complete a preliminary status report that shall include, but need not be
85 limited to, (A) the name of the deceased person, (B) the gender, race,
86 ethnicity and age of the deceased person, (C) the date, time and location
87 of the injury causing such death, (D) the law enforcement agency
88 involved, (E) the status on the toxicology report, if available, and (F) the
89 death certificate, if available. The Inspector General shall complete the
90 report and submit a copy of such report not later than five business days
91 after the cause of the death is available to the Chief State's Attorney and,
92 in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint standing
93 committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
94 relating to the judiciary and public safety.
95 (b) Upon the conclusion of the investigation of an incident described
96 in subdivision [(1) or] (2) or (3) of subsection (a) of this section, the
97 Inspector General shall file a report with the Chief State's Attorney
98 which shall contain the following: (1) The circumstances of the incident,
99 (2) a determination of whether the use of physical force by the peace
100 officer was justifiable under section 53a-22, as amended by this act, and
101 (3) any recommended future action to be taken by the Office of the
102 Inspector General as a result of the incident. The Chief State's Attorney
103 shall provide a copy of the report to the chief executive officer of the
104 municipality in which the incident occurred and to the Commissioner
105 of Emergency Services and Public Protection or the chief of police of
106 such municipality, as the case may be, and shall make such report
107 available to the public on the Division of Criminal Justice's Internet web
108 site not later than forty-eight hours after the copies are provided to the
109 chief executive officer and the commissioner or chief of police.
110 (c) The Office of the Inspector General shall prosecute any case in
111 which the Inspector General determines that (1) the use of force by a
112 peace officer was not justifiable under section 53a-22, as amended by
113 this act, or (2) there was a failure to intervene in such incident or to
114 report any such incident, as required under subsection (a) of section 7-
115 282e or section 18-81nn.
116 Sec. 2. Section 53a-22 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
LCO 4 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 91
117 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
118 passage):
119 (a) (1) For purposes of this section: [, a] (A) A reasonable belief that a
120 person has committed an offense means a reasonable belief in facts or
121 circumstances which if true would in law constitute an offense. If the
122 believed facts or circumstances would not in law constitute an offense,
123 an erroneous though not unreasonable belief that the law is otherwise
124 does not render justifiable the use of physical force to make an arrest or
125 to prevent an escape from custody; and (B) notwithstanding the
126 provisions of subdivision (9) of section 53a-3, "peace officer" has the
127 same meaning as provided in section 51-277a, as amended by this act.
128 (2) A peace officer or an authorized official of the Department of
129 Correction or the Board of Pardons and Paroles who is effecting an
130 arrest pursuant to a warrant or preventing an escape from custody is
131 justified in using the physical force prescribed in subsections (b), (c) and
132 (d) of this section unless such warrant is invalid and is known by such
133 officer to be invalid.
134 (b) Except as provided in subsection (a) or (d) of this section, a peace
135 officer or an authorized official of the Department of Correction or the
136 Board of Pardons and Paroles is justified in using physical force upon
137 another person when and to the extent that he or she reasonably believes
138 such use to be necessary to: (1) Effect an arrest or prevent the escape
139 from custody of a person whom he or she reasonably believes to have
140 committed an offense, unless he or she knows that the arrest or custody
141 is unauthorized; or (2) defend himself or herself or a third person from
142 the use or imminent use of physical force while effecting or attempting
143 to effect an arrest or while preventing or attempting to prevent an
144 escape.
145 (c) (1) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, a peace
146 officer or an authorized official of the Department of Correction or the
147 Board of Pardons and Paroles is justified in using deadly physical force
148 upon another person for the purposes specified in subsection (b) of this
LCO 5 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 91
149 section only when his or her actions are objectively reasonable under the
150 given circumstances at that time, and:
151 (A) He or she reasonably believes such use to be necessary to defend
152 himself or herself or a third person from the use or imminent use of
153 deadly physical force; or
154 (B) He or she (i) has reasonably determined that there are no available
155 reasonable alternatives to the use of deadly physical force, (ii)
156 reasonably believes that the force employed creates no unreasonable
157 risk of injury to a third party, and (iii) reasonably believes such use of
158 force to be necessary to (I) effect an arrest of a person whom he or she
159 reasonably believes has committed or attempted to commit a felony
160 which involved the infliction of serious physical injury, and if, where
161 feasible, he or she has given warning of his or her intent to use deadly
162 physical force, or (II) prevent the escape from custody of a person whom
163 he or she reasonably believes has committed a felony which involved
164 the infliction of serious physical injury and who poses a significant
165 threat of death or serious physical injury to others, and if, where feasible,
166 he or she has given warning of his or her intent to use deadly physical
167 force.
168 (2) For purposes of evaluating whether actions of a peace officer or
169 an authorized official of the Department of Correction or the Board of
170 Pardons and Paroles are reasonable under subdivision (1) of this
171 subsection, factors to be considered include, but are not limited to,
172 whether (A) the person upon whom deadly physical force was used
173 possessed or appeared to possess a deadly weapon, (B) the peace officer
174 or an authorized official of the Department of Correction or the Board
175 of Pardons and Paroles engaged in reasonable deescalation measures
176 prior to using deadly physical force, and (C) any unreasonable conduct
177 of the peace officer or an authorized official of the Department of
178 Correction or the Board of Pardons and Paroles led to an increased risk
179 of an occurrence of the situation that precipitated the use of such force.
180 (d) A peace officer or an authorized official of the Department of
LCO 6 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 91
181 Correction or the Board of Pardons and Paroles is justified in using a
182 chokehold or other method of restraint applied to the neck area or that
183 otherwise impedes the ability to breathe or restricts blood circulation to
184 the brain of another person for the purposes specified in subsection (b)
185 of this section only when he or she reasonably believes such use to be
186 necessary to defend himself or herself or a third person from the use or
187 imminent use of deadly physical force.
188 (e) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, a person who
189 has been directed by a peace officer or an authorized official of the
190 Department of Correction or the Board of Pardons and Paroles to assist
191 such peace officer or official to effect an arrest or to prevent an escape
192 from custody is justified in using reasonable physical force when and to
193 the extent that he or she reasonably believes such to be necessary to
194 carry out such peace officer's or official's direction.
195 (f) A person who has been directed to assist a peace officer or an
196 authorized official of the Department of Correction or the Board of
197 Pardons and Paroles under circumstances specified in subsection (e) of
198 this section may use deadly physical force to effect an arrest or to
199 prevent an escape from custody only when: (1) He or she reasonably
200 believes such use to be necessary to defend himself or herself or a third
201 person from what he or she reasonably believes to be the use or
202 imminent use of deadly physical force; or (2) he or she is directed or
203 authorized by such peace officer or official to use deadly physical force,
204 unless he or she knows that the peace officer or official himself or herself
205 is not authorized to use deadly physical force under the circumstances.
206 (g) A private person acting on his or her own account is justified in
207 using reasonable physical force upon another person when and to the
208 extent that he or she reasonably believes such use to be necessary to
209 effect an arrest or to prevent the escape from custody of an arrested
210 person whom he or she reasonably believes to have committed an
211 offense and who in fact has committed such offense; but he or she is not
212 justified in using deadly physical force in such circumstances, except in
213 defense of person as prescribed in section 53a-19.
LCO 7 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 91
214 (h) In determining whether use of force by a peace officer who is a
215 police officer, as defined in subsection (a) of section 29-6d, is justified
216 pursuant to this section, the trier of fact may draw an unfavorable
217 inference from a police officer's deliberate failure in violation of section
218 29-6d to record such use of physical force.
219 Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
220 (1) "Protected area" means any of the following buildings or locations,
221 including the grounds of such buildings or locations and any garages or
222 parking lots utilized in the operation of such buildings or locations,
223 irrespective of whether such garages or parking lots are contiguous to
224 the buildings or locations:
225 (A) A school, including, but not limited to, a preschool, primary or
226 secondary school, vocational school or college or university;
227 (B) A medical or mental health facility, including, but not limited to,
228 a hospital, doctor's office, health clinic, vaccination or testing site, urgent
229 care center, site that serves pregnant individuals or community health
230 center;
231 (C) A place of worship or religious study, whether in a structure
232 dedicated to activities of faith or a temporary facility or location where
233 such activities take place;
234 (D) A place where children gather, including, but not limited to, a
235 playground, recreation center, child care center, before or after-school
236 care center, foster care facility, group home for children or school bus
237 stop;
238 (E) A social services establishment, including, but not limited to, a
239 crisis center, domestic violence shelter, victims services center, child
240 advocacy center, supervised visitation center, family justice center,
241 community-based organization, facility that serves disabled persons,
242 homeless shelter, drug or alcohol counseling and treatment facility or
243 food bank, pantry or other establishment distributing food or other
LCO 8 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 91
244 essentials of life to people in need;
245 (F) A place where disaster or emergency response and relief is
246 provided, including, but not limited to, such places along evacuation
247 routes, where shelter or emergency supplies, food or water are being
248 distributed, or registration for disaster-related assistance or family
249 reunification is underway;
250 (G) A place where a funeral, graveside ceremony, rosary, wedding or
251 other religious or civil ceremonies or observances occur; or
252 (H) A place where there is an ongoing parade, demonstration or rally.
253 (2) "State facility" means any building, or part thereof, owned, leased,
254 occupied, controlled by or used for business by an office or agency of
255 the Executive Department, either directly or indirectly, including, but
256 not limited to, entities providing direct services on behalf of offices or
257 agencies, but not including state-owned property leased to a federal
258 entity. "State facility" includes the grounds of such facility and any
259 garages or parking lots utilized in the operation of such facility,
260 irrespective of whether such garages or parking lots are contiguous to
261 the facility.
262 (3) "Municipal facility" means any building or part thereof, owned,
263 leased, occupied, controlled by or used for business by a municipal
264 government, either directly or indirectly, including, but not limited to,
265 entities providing direct services on behalf of a municipal government.
266 "Municipal facility" includes the grounds of such facility and any
267 garages or parking lots utilized in the operation of such facility,
268 irrespective of whether such garages or parking lots are contiguous to
269 the facility.
270 (4) "Exigent circumstance" means the following:
271 (A) An enforcement action involving a national security threat;
272 (B) An imminent risk of death, violence or physical harm to a person;
LCO 9 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 91
273 (C) An enforcement action involving the hot pursuit of an individual
274 who poses a public safety threat;
275 (D) An imminent risk that evidence material to a criminal case will be
276 destroyed; or
277 (E) A situation enforcement action where a safe alternative location
278 does not exist.
279 (5) "Designated individual" means any individual assigned by
280 persons responsible for operating a protected area, state facility or
281 municipal facility to review documentation provided by federal law
282 enforcement authorities.
283 (b) No representative of a federal law enforcement authority shall
284 detain, arrest or otherwise take an individual in a protected area, state
285 facility or municipal facility into custody on the basis of a civil offense,
286 unless such representative (1) is acting in the representative's official
287 capacity, and (2) has documentation demonstrating that the individual
288 to be detained, arrested or otherwise taken into custody (A) is the subject
289 of a judicial warrant, (B) has been convicted of (i) a violation of section
290 53-21 of the general statutes, 53a-56a of the general statutes, 53a-64aa of
291 the general statutes, 53a-71 of the general statutes, 53a-72a of the general
292 statutes, 53a-72b of the general statutes, 53a-90a of the general statutes,
293 53a-102a of the general statutes, 53a-196e of the general statutes, 53a-
294 196f of the general statutes, 53a-196i of the general statutes, 53a-222 of
295 the general statutes or 53a-223 of the general statutes, or (ii) any class A
296 or B felony offense, or (C) is identified as a possible match in the federal
297 Terrorist Screening Database or similar database.
298 (c) Any designated individual receiving documentation pursuant to
299 subsection (b) of this section shall promptly review such
300 documentation. No representative of a federal law enforcement
301 authority shall detain, arrest or otherwise take an individual in a
302 protected area, state facility or municipal facility into custody on the
303 basis of a civil offense who is the subject of such documentation, unless
304 the designated individual determines, based upon such review, that
LCO 10 of 11

Substitute Bill No. 91
305 such individual (1) is the subject of a judicial warrant, (2) has been
306 convicted of (A) a violation of section 53-21 of the general statutes, 53a-
307 56a of the general statutes, 53a-64aa of the general statutes, 53a-71 of the
308 general statutes, 53a-72a of the general statutes, 53a-72b of the general
309 statutes, 53a-90a of the general statutes, 53a-102a of the general statutes,
310 53a-196e of the general statutes, 53a-196f of the general statutes, 53a-196i
311 of the general statutes, 53a-222 of the general statutes or 53a-223 of the
312 general statutes, or (B) any class A or B felony offense, or (3) is identified
313 as a possible match in the federal Terrorist Screening Database or similar
314 database.
315 (d) A federal law enforcement authority may perform an enforcement
316 action at a protected area, state facility or municipal facility if an exigent
317 circumstance exists. If no such exigent circumstance exists, the federal
318 law enforcement authority shall comply with the provisions of
319 subsection (b) of this section.
320 (e) Any violation of this section shall be deemed breach of the peace
321 in the second degree and punished in accordance with the provisions of
322 section 53a-181 of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 51-277a
Sec. 2 from passage 53a-22
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1, "deadly force" was changed to "deadly physical force" for
accuracy.
JUD Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 11 of 11